Missouri, session 2026, HB2719.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.620, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 376.620, to read as follows:
376.620. 1. Any life insurance policy, rider, endorsement, amendment, or certificate
issued or delivered in this state may exclude or restrict liability under such policy, rider,
endorsement, amendment, or certificate for death as the result of suicide in the event the
insured, while sane or insane, dies as a result of suicide within [one year] two years from the
date of the issue of such policy, rider, endorsement, amendment, or certificate. If an insured
applies for additional death benefits or an increase in death benefits after initial coverage
commences, the policy, rider, endorsement, amendment, or certificate may provide for an
exclusion for suicide that occurs within [one year] two years after any addition or increase in
death benefits only to the extent of the additional or increased death benefits. Any such
exclusion or restriction shall be clearly stated in such policy, rider, endorsement, amendment,
or certificate.
2. Any life insurance policy, rider, endorsement, amendment, or certificate which
contains any exclusion or restriction under subsection 1 of this section shall also provide that
in the event the insured dies as a result of suicide within [one year] two yearsfrom the date of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2719 2
issue of such policy, rider, endorsement, amendment, or certificate that the insurer shall
promptly refund all premiums paid for the excluded or restricted coverage on such insured.
✔